Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.40.170

Restriction on loans. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) A loan is considered to be a contribution from the lender and any guarantor of the loan and is subject to the contribution limitations of this title. The full amount of the loan shall be attributed to the lender and to each guarantor.

(2) A loan to a candidate for public office or the candidate's authorized committee must be by written agreement.

(3) The proceeds of a loan made to a candidate for public office:

(a) By a commercial lending institution;

(b) Made in the regular course of business; and

(c) On the same terms ordinarily available to members of the public, are not subject to the contribution limits of this title.

[ 2024 c 164 s 459; 2010 c 204 s 610; 1995 c 397 s 22; 1993 c 2 s 12 (Initiative Measure No. 134, approved November 3, 1992). Formerly RCW 42.17A.465, 42.17.720.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Effective date—1995 c 397: See note following RCW 29B.40.020.

Short title—1993 c 2: See note following RCW 29B.40.010.